dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- विविध; विविध; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विविध__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दह्रो; दह्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दह्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सम्पन्न; सम्पन्न; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सम्पन्न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चोखो; चोख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चोख/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रजातान्त्रिक; प्रजातान्त्रिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रजातान्त्रिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नराम्रो; नराम्र; 3 -->
    <pardef n="नराम्र/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रधान; प्रधान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रधान__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- वर्तमान; वर्तमान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="वर्तमान__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हेलो; हेलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हेलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साँचो; साँच; 2 -->
    <pardef n="साँच/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रत्यक्ष; प्रत्यक्ष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रत्यक्ष__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गाह्रो; गाह्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गाह्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोटामोटी; मोटामोटी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोटामोटी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- चहकिलो; चहकिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="चहकिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खोक्रो; खोक्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खोक्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गहिरो; गहिर; 2 -->
    <pardef n="गहिर/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- छानो; छानो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="छानो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काडा; क; 1 -->
    <pardef n="क/ाडा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>डा</l>
          <r>ाडा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोज्याङ्ग्रो; गोज्याङ्ग्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गोज्याङ्ग्र/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निन्याउरो; निन्याउरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निन्याउरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साँघुरो; साँघुर; 2 -->
    <pardef n="साँघुर/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- होची-अर्गेली; होची-अर्गेली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="होची-अर्गेली__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झुत्रो; झुत्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झुत्र/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- संगालो; संगालो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="संगालो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- होचो; होच; 2 -->
    <pardef n="होच/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पूरा; पूरा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पूरा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धन; धन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धन__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गतिलो; गतिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गतिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठूलो-सानो; ठूल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ठूल/ो-सानो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-साना</l>
          <r>ो-सानो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फेरो; फेरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फेरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विशेष; विशेष; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विशेष__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महँगो; मह; 2 -->
    <pardef n="मह/ँगो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ँगो</l>
          <r>ँगो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ंगा</l>
          <r>ँगो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रूखो; रूख; 2 -->
    <pardef n="रूख/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- साझा; साझा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="साझा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सग्लो; सग्लो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सग्लो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- थोत्रो; थोत्रो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="थोत्रो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- झूटो; झूटो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="झूटो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बीचो; बीचो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बीचो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खरो; खरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जावो; जावो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जावो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="विविध"><i>विविध</i><par n="विविध__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="दह्रो"><i>दह्रो</i><par n="दह्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सम्पन्न"><i>सम्पन्न</i><par n="सम्पन्न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चोखो"><i>चोख</i><par n="चोख/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रजातान्त्रिक"><i>प्रजातान्त्रिक</i><par n="प्रजातान्त्रिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नराम्रो"><i>नराम्र</i><par n="नराम्र/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रधान"><i>प्रधान</i><par n="प्रधान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="वर्तमान"><i>वर्तमान</i><par n="वर्तमान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हेलो"><i>हेलो</i><par n="हेलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साँचो"><i>साँच</i><par n="साँच/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रत्यक्ष"><i>प्रत्यक्ष</i><par n="प्रत्यक्ष__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गाह्रो"><i>गाह्रो</i><par n="गाह्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="मोटामोटी"><i>मोटामोटी</i><par n="मोटामोटी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="चहकिलो"><i>चहकिलो</i><par n="चहकिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खोक्रो"><i>खोक्रो</i><par n="खोक्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गहिरो"><i>गहिर</i><par n="गहिर/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="छानो"><i>छानो</i><par n="छानो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="काडा"><i>क</i><par n="क/ाडा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गोज्याङ्ग्रो"><i>गोज्याङ्ग्र</i><par n="गोज्याङ्ग्र/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निन्याउरो"><i>निन्याउरो</i><par n="निन्याउरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साँघुरो"><i>साँघुर</i><par n="साँघुर/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="होची-अर्गेली"><i>होची-अर्गेली</i><par n="होची-अर्गेली__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झुत्रो"><i>झुत्र</i><par n="झुत्र/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="संगालो"><i>संगालो</i><par n="संगालो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="होचो"><i>होच</i><par n="होच/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पूरा"><i>पूरा</i><par n="पूरा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="धन"><i>धन</i><par n="धन__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="गतिलो"><i>गतिलो</i><par n="गतिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठूलो-सानो"><i>ठूल</i><par n="ठूल/ो-सानो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="फेरो"><i>फेरो</i><par n="फेरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विशेष"><i>विशेष</i><par n="विशेष__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="महँगो"><i>मह</i><par n="मह/ँगो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रूखो"><i>रूख</i><par n="रूख/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="साझा"><i>साझा</i><par n="साझा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सग्लो"><i>सग्लो</i><par n="सग्लो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="थोत्रो"><i>थोत्रो</i><par n="थोत्रो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="झूटो"><i>झूटो</i><par n="झूटो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बीचो"><i>बीचो</i><par n="बीचो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खरो"><i>खरो</i><par n="खरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="जावो"><i>जावो</i><par n="जावो__adj"/></e>
